Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 41.15.950.
Enforcement authority.

The following persons are peace officers of the state and they shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter:

solely for the purpose of enforcing this chapter, an employee of the department, or other person, authorized by the commissioner;

a police officer in the state.

A person designated in (a) of this section may, when enforcing the provisions of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter,

execute a warrant or other process issued by an officer or court of competent jurisdiction;

administer or take an oath, affirmation, or affidavit;

arrest a person who violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter; and

issue a citation to a person who violates a provision of AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.170

or a regulation adopted under this chapter.

A person is not required under this section to disclose a deadly weapon under AS

11.61.220(a)(1)(A)

to a peace officer described under (a)(1) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 179 SLA 1970; am §§ 20, 21 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.15.700. Renumbered in 1983.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, added (b)(4), and made related changes; added (c). Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.960.
Bail schedules.

The supreme court shall establish by rule or order a schedule of bail amounts for offenses under this chapter or under regulations adopted under this chapter that allow the disposition of a citation without a court appearance. The bail amount may not exceed the maximum fine authorized by law for that offense.

History.

(§ 22 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 27,
ch. 63, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 1, 2018.